Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-455.01
Permit to
hunt antelope, elk, deer, and wild turkey; auction or lottery permits; issuance; fee.

The
commission may issue auction or lottery permits for up to five permits each
for antelope and elk and up to twenty-five permits each for deer and wild
turkey during the calendar year. Included in that number are single species
and combination species permits and shared revenue permits that may be issued
by the commission. The shared revenue permits may be issued under agreements
with nonprofit conservation organizations and may be issued by auction or
lottery, with the commission receiving at least eighty percent of any profit
realized. The commission shall by rule and regulation adopt limitations for
any such permits that are issued. The auction or lottery shall be conducted
according to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. The commission shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to set a nonrefundable lottery application fee for each
type of single species or combination species permit offered directly through
the commission.

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 18;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 20.